test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-saergj36_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - särǵ: # Noun (36) särǵ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    särǵ+N+Sg+Nom: särǵ
    särǵ+N+Sg+Gen: säre
    särǵ+N+Sg+Par: särge
    särǵ+N+Sg+Ill: särge
    särǵ+N+Sg+Ine: [sären, säreh, särehn]
    särǵ+N+Sg+Ela: särest
    särǵ+N+Sg+All: särele
    särǵ+N+Sg+Ade: särel
    särǵ+N+Sg+Abl: särelt
    särǵ+N+Sg+Tra: säres
    särǵ+N+Sg+Ter: säreniq
    särǵ+N+Sg+Abe: säreldäq
    särǵ+N+Sg+Com: säregaq
    särǵ+N+Pl+Nom: säreq
    särǵ+N+Pl+Gen: särgi
    särǵ+N+Pl+Par: särgi
    särǵ+N+Pl+Ill: [särgihe, särgi, särgide]
    särǵ+N+Pl+Ine: [särin, särih, särihn]
    särǵ+N+Pl+Ela: särist
    särǵ+N+Pl+All: särile
    särǵ+N+Pl+Ade: säril
    särǵ+N+Pl+Abl: särilt
    särǵ+N+Pl+Tra: säris
    särǵ+N+Pl+Ter: säriniq
    särǵ+N+Pl+Abe: särildäq
    särǵ+N+Pl+Com: särgigaq
